Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2923
Official test, defined.

Official test means a diagnostic test approved by USDA/APHIS/VS or the department for determining the presence or absence of a program disease.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 23.